Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1276
Existing Business Assistance Division; contracts; authorized.

The Existing Business Assistance Division may contract with any postsecondary institution of higher education, community organization, governmental agency or entity, or any other profit or nonprofit entity to provide specialized research, technology development assistance, technology transfer services, financial packaging or leveraging services, human resources development services, surety bond support, or such other specialized services as the division deems necessary if preference is given to entities based in or operating in Nebraska.

Laws 1987, LB 736, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 861, § 1.